Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TEMPORARY SALES TAX EXEMPTION; CREDIT CARD TRANSACTION FEES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) For a business that meets the following criteria, "sales price" as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.61, subdivision 7, does not include credit card transaction fees charged to a customer for sales tax liability incurred after June 30, 2020, and before January 1, 2024: new text end new text begin (1) located in a county with a population greater than 36,000 but less than 37,000 as of the 2020 federal census; and new text end new text begin (2) licensed as a brewer under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, and holds a retail on-sale license. new text end new text begin (b) Businesses that paid sales and use taxes on items exempted under subdivision 1 may apply for a refund in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner of revenue. The applicant must be the owner of a business that meets the criteria in paragraph (a). Refunds must not be issued until after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2020, and before January 1, 2024. new text end